Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.84.720

Officers—Violations generally.

Every person charged with the performance of any duty under the provisions of any law of this state relating to elections, including primaries, or the provisions of any charter or ordinance of any city or town of this state relating to elections who willfully neglects or refuses to perform such duty, or provides unauthorized access to a person or entity to physical locations or electronic or physical access to election software or hardware used in any element of conduct of an election, or who, in the performance of such duty, or in the person's official capacity, knowingly or fraudulently violates any of the provisions of law relating to such duty, is guilty of a class C felony punishable under RCW 9A.20.021 and shall forfeit the person's office.

[ 2024 c 28 s 9; 2003 c 111 s 2138. Prior: 1991 c 81 s 10; 1965 c 9 s 29.85.170; prior: (i) 1889 p 412 s 32; RRS s 5297. (ii) 1911 c 89 s 1, part; Code 1881 s 912; 1877 p 205 s 2; RRS s 5392. Formerly RCW 29.85.170.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1991 c 81: See note following RCW 29A.84.540.